Alaska, session 34, HB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 18.23.005 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 18.23.005. Patient access to records. Notwithstanding the provisions of 05 AS 18.23.005 - 18.23.070 or any other law, a patient is entitled to inspect and copy 06 any records developed or maintained by a health care provider or other person 07 pertaining to the health care rendered to the patient. A health care provider or other 08 person that offers electronic access to patient records shall make all available 09 electronic patient records accessible to each individual authorized by law to 10 access the records of the patient. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.